Hawaii statutes.
§102-13 Amendment of contracts, when
authorized. Where there is an outstanding contract, lease, license,
permit, or any other such arrangement for the operation of concessions or
concession spaces on governmental property, the parties may amend the instrument
to permit a related use with an increased rental adjustment where the lessee,
licensee or permittee, as the case may be, can show financial hardship arising
out of changes of circumstances or otherwise, if required to continue operation
under the original permitted use. [L 1962, c 5, §5; Supp, §7B-11.5; HRS
§102-13]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next